Georgia, session 2025_26, SB200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 2 of Title 1 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to persons and their
rights, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"1-2-12.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Abortifacient' means a method of inhibiting the development of a human pregnancy
at any stage following conception.
(2) 'Abortion' means the use of any means to terminate the pregnancy of a woman known
to be pregnant with knowledge that the termination will, with reasonable likelihood,
cause the death of the unborn child.
S. B. 200
- 1 -

LC 57 0153ER
(3) 'Conception' means the process of combining the male sperm with the female ovum,
resulting in a fertilized ovum or zygote.
(4) 'Contraception' means a method of inhibiting the development of a human pregnancy
at any stage prior to conception. Contraception does not include an abortifacient.
(b) The State of Georgia recognizes that life is valued and protected from the moment of
conception and that each life, from that moment, is accorded the same rights and
protections guaranteed to all persons by the Constitution of the United States, the Georgia
Constitution, and the laws of Georgia.
(c) This Code section shall not be construed to create or recognize a right to abortion or
to prohibit the use of any means of contraception."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 200
- 2 -